Georgia, session 2025_26, HB662.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 31-8-9.1 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to eligibility to
receive tax credits, is amended by revising paragraph (3) of subsection (a) as follows:
"(3) 'Rural hospital organization' means an acute care hospital or rural freestanding
emergency department licensed by the department pursuant to Article 1 of Chapter 7 of
this title that:
(A) Has its primary campus or operates an outpatient emergency clinic Provides
inpatient hospital services at a facility located in a rural county or is a critical access
hospital;
(B) Participates in both Medicaid and medicare Medicare and accepts both Medicaid
and medicare Medicare patients;
H. B. 662 (SUB)
- 1 -

LC 46 2000S
(C) Provides health care services to indigent patients;
(D) Has at least 10 percent of its annual net revenue categorized as indigent care,
charity care, or bad debt;
(E) Annually files IRS Form 990, Return of Organization Exempt From Income Tax,
with the department, or for any hospital not required to file IRS Form 990, the
department will provide a form that collects the same information to be submitted to the
department on an annual basis;
(F) Is operated by a county or municipal authority pursuant to Article 4 of Chapter 7
of this title or is designated as a tax-exempt organization under Section 501(c)(3) of the
Internal Revenue Code;
(G) Is current with all audits and reports required by law; and
(H) Has a three-year average patient margin, as a percent of expense, less than one
standard deviation above the state-wide three-year average of organizations defined in
subparagraphs (A) through (G) of this paragraph, as calculated by the department. For
purposes of this subparagraph, the term 'patient margin' means gross patient revenues
less contractual adjustments, bad debt, indigent and charity care, other uncompensated
care, and total expenses."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 662 (SUB)
- 2 -